Rhode Island, session 2025, SB930.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 12 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL PROCEDURE" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.4
SENTENCING RECONSIDERATION ACT
12-19.4-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Sentencing Reconsideration Act.”
12-19.4-2. Purpose and intent.
This chapter aims to create a fair and just process for sentence reconsideration based
on demonstrated rehabilitation, changes in law, and other compelling factors. It allows eligible
individuals to request sentence reductions and provides guidance to the judiciary for evaluating
sentencing reconsideration motions. This chapter acknowledges that people change over time and
provides a mechanism for sentences to be revisited in cases where original sentencing goals are
satisfied or where new circumstances justify a reevaluation.
12-19.4-3. Eligibility for sentencing reconsideration.
(a) With regard to eligibility criteria, a defendant shall have served at least ten (10)
years of their sentence of incarceration to apply for a sentencing reconsideration.
(b) With regard to exclusions, relief under this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Sentences of life without parole; or
(2) Mandatory sentences of incarceration.

12-19.4-4. Grounds for reconsideration.
The court may consider the following factors when evaluating a motion for
reconsideration:
(1) Rehabilitative efforts:
(i) Documented evidence of rehabilitation, including educational achievements, vocational
training, participation in treatment programs, and positive contributions to the facility or
community;
(ii) Testimonials from prison staff, community members, or professionals detailing the
individual’s progress and personal growth;
(iii) Efforts to address underlying causes of criminal behavior including, but not limited to,
substance use, mental health, and childhood trauma.
(2) Changes in law: Any amendments to federal or state laws that would have affected the
individual’s sentence if applied retroactively. In such cases, judicial discretion shall be used to
evaluate whether legislative intent suggests a reduction in penalties or reconsideration.
(3) Sentencing disparities: Consideration of whether sentencing disparities among co-
defendants or other cases might justify a reduction.
(4) Compassionate considerations: Age at the time of the offense, age at the time of the
motion for sentence reconsideration, mental and physical health conditions, and any other factor
consistent with the purpose and intent of this chapter that the court determines to be appropriate.
12-19.4-5. Process and procedure.
(a) The defendant or their legal representative may file a motion for sentence
reconsideration, along with supporting documentation. The motion should include a statement
detailing rehabilitative efforts, certificates, evidence of changes in law, and any additional factors
for consideration.
(b) The court shall hold a meaningful hearing to evaluate the motion. During this hearing,
the individual, their legal counsel, the prosecution, and any relevant witnesses may present
evidence, testimony, and/or arguments. An applicant who is indigent shall be entitled to be
represented by court appointed counsel. Such indigent applicant is entitled, to the extent deemed
appropriate by the court, to be provided with stenographic, printing, and other costs necessary to
proceed under this chapter.
(c) In evaluating the motion, the court shall assess the following pursuant to this chapter:
(1) Whether the defendant is eligible for consideration;
(2) Whether the grounds for reconsideration outlined in this section, along with other
factors establish significant evidence in support of a reduced sentence;
LC002375 - Page 2 of 5

(3) The impact statement, if any, of any victim(s);
(4) The nature and circumstances of the underlying offense;
(5) Any potential risk to public safety if the defendant’s sentence were to be reduced.
(d) After hearing thereon, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
court may reduce the defendant’s sentence if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that
grounds exist to warrant a sentence modification. The court may impose a revised term of probation
or suspended sentence, with or without conditions. The revised sentence shall not exceed the
unserved portion of the original term of imprisonment. The court shall set forth its findings in
support of the decision. A judgment reflecting the revised sentence and/or conditions of release
shall enter.
(e) Should the defendant’s motion be denied, in whole or in part, the defendant may not
file a successive motion for reconsideration until at least five (5) years have elapsed after the date
the motion was denied in the superior court.
(f) An aggrieved party seeking review of a final judgment entered in a proceeding brought
under this chapter shall do so by filing a petition for writ of certiorari in accordance with the
supreme court rules of appellate procedure within sixty (60) days of the entry of the final judgment.
12-19.4-6. Victim’s rights.
Consistent with Article 1, Section 23 of the Constitution of Rhode Island and chapter 28
of title 12, the rights of the victim of the defendant’s crime shall include the following:
(1) To be given notice to address the court at the hearing regarding the impact of the crime
upon them;
(2) To be afforded the opportunity to make a statement at the hearing either in person or in
writing regarding the impact of the defendant’s criminal conduct; and
(3) To be notified by the department of attorney general of any such disposition of the
motion.
12-19.4-7. Severability.
If any section or provision of this chapter is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the
remaining sections or provisions shall continue in full force and effect.
SECTION 2. Section 8-2-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-2 entitled "Superior Court"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-2-17. Jurisdiction of appeals, statutory proceedings, and probate matters.
The superior court shall have jurisdiction of such appeals and statutory proceedings as may
be provided by law, and may exercise general probate jurisdiction in all cases brought before it on
appeal from probate courts, or when such jurisdiction is properly involved in suits in equity as well
LC002375 - Page 3 of 5

as jurisdiction regarding motions brought pursuant to chapter 19.4 of title 12.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall have both retroactive and
prospective application. Any applicable sentences imposed before or after its effective date shall
be eligible for consideration by the court.
========
LC002375
========
LC002375 - Page 4 of 5